lietuviu.aff
        Ė S I           >       -ĖSI,YMUISI
        Ė S I           >       -ĖSI,YMĄSI
        Ė S I           >       -ĖSI,YMUSI
        Ė S I           >       -ĖSI,YMESI

        O S I           >       -OSI,IMASIS
        O S I           >       -OSI,IMOSI
        O S I           >       -OSI,IMUISI
        O S I           >       -OSI,IMĄSI
        O S I           >       -OSI,IMUSI
        O S I           >       -OSI,IMESI


        # Dgsk., vyr. gim.
        Ė               >       -Ė,YMAISI       # skaitymaisi
        Ė               >       -Ė,YMŲSI
        #Ė              >       -Ė,YMAMSIS
        #Ė              >       -Ė,YMUSIS
        #Ė              >       -Ė,YMAISIS
        #Ė              >       -Ė,YMUOSESI

        O               >       -O,IMAISI       # vijimaisi
        O               >       -O,IMŲSI
        #O              >       -O,IMAMSIS
        #O              >       -O,IMUSIS
        #O              >       -O,IMAISIS
        #O              >       -O,IMUOSESI

        # sngr.
        Ė S I           >       -ĖSI,YMAISI
        Ė S I           >       -ĖSI,YMŲSI
        #Ė S I          >       -ĖSI,YMAMSIS
        #Ė S I          >       -ĖSI,YMUSIS
        #Ė S I          >       -ĖSI,YMAISIS
        #Ė S I          >       -ĖSI,YMUOSESI

        O S I           >       -OSI,IMAISI
        O S I           >       -OSI,IMŲSI
        #O S I          >       -OSI,IMAMSIS
        #O S I          >       -OSI,IMUSIS
        #O S I          >       -OSI,IMAISIS
        #O S I          >       -OSI,IMUOSESI
